District of Columbia statutes.
7-2032

Applicability and scope.

(a)

This subchapter shall apply to every child development facility and care giver in the District of Columbia.

(b)

Unless exempted by this subchapter or the laws of other jurisdictions, the provisions and requirements in this subchapter shall also apply to all child development facilities operated by the District government outside the District of Columbia.

History

Apr. 13, 1999, D.C. Law 12-215, § 3, 46 DCR 274

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 6-3622.

Temporary Addition of Section

See notes to § 7-2031.

Emergency Legislation

For temporary addition of subchapter, see notes to § 7-2031.